Louisiana, session 2026, HB932.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:550.33 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§550.33. Short title
A. The Legislature finds that:
(1) Commercial trucking insurance premiums in Louisiana have increased
significantly, with small and independent carriers bearing a disproportionate share
of cost increases.
(2) Large national trucking companies increasingly utilize captive insurance
arrangements that allow them to exit the commercial insurance market and retain
premium dollars rather than purchasing coverage in the commercial insurance
market.
Page 1 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
(3) The exit of high-quality risks through captive arrangements results in
adverse selection and higher premiums for remaining market participants.
(4) Small and independent Louisiana commercial trucking companies,
including minority-owned and disadvantaged business enterprises, lack the scale to
form captive arrangements and therefore bear the full cost burden of the commercial
market.
(5) Captive insurers covering Louisiana commercial trucking risks may
maintain inadequate reserves to satisfy catastrophic claims, leaving injured Louisiana
residents without adequate recovery.
(6) Comprehensive market reform addressing adverse selection, expanding
access for small carriers, establishing minimum solvency standards, and requiring
coverage transparency serves the economic, safety, and equity interests of the state.
B. The purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Correct market distortion created by captive insurance adverse selection.
(2) Expand affordable insurance access for small and minority-owned
Louisiana commercial trucking companies.
(3) Protect accident victims by ensuring captive insurers maintain adequate
reserves.
(4) Promote transparency in insurance coverage available to satisfy
commercial trucking claims.
§550.34. Definitions
As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed
to them in this Section:
(1) "Captive insurer" means any insurance entity, including a pure captive,
group captive, risk retention group, or protected cell captive, that is owned or
controlled by the insured entity or entities and that provides insurance coverage
primarily or exclusively to the owner or member entities or their affiliates.
(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of the Louisiana Department
of Insurance.
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
(3) "Commercial motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle used in commerce
to transport passengers or property that:
(a) has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight rating of
10,001 pounds or more;
(b) is designed to transport more than eight passengers, including the driver,
for compensation; or
(c) is used in the transportation of materials found to be hazardous under
applicable federal or state law.
(4) "Commercial trucking company" means any person or entity engaged in
the business of transporting property by commercial motor vehicle for compensation
within or through the State of Louisiana.
(5) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Insurance.
(6) "Louisiana commercial trucking risk" means any risk of liability, cargo
loss, physical damage, or bodily injury arising out of the operation of a commercial
motor vehicle on Louisiana public roadways or arising out of commercial trucking
operations within this state.
(7) "Louisiana-domiciled commercial trucking company" means a
commercial trucking company that:
(a) maintains its principal place of business in Louisiana;
(b) is registered with the Louisiana Secretary of State; or
(c) operates more than fifty percent of its fleet miles within Louisiana.
(8) "Market Access Fund" means the fund established pursuant to §550.36
of this Act.
(9) "Retained premium" means the portion of insurance premium attributable
to Louisiana commercial trucking risks that is retained by a captive insurer and not
ceded to an unaffiliated reinsurer.
(10) "Small carrier" means a Louisiana-domiciled commercial trucking
company that owns, operates, or leases fewer than twenty-five commercial motor
vehicles.
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
§550.35. Scope of Application
A. The provisions of this Part shall apply to any captive insurer that covers
Louisiana commercial trucking risks, regardless of the state or jurisdiction in which
the captive insurer is domiciled. As a condition of the right of any commercial
trucking company utilizing a captive insurer to operate commercial motor vehicles
on Louisiana public roadways or to conduct commercial trucking operations within
Louisiana, the captive insurer shall comply with the contribution requirements of this
Part.
§550.36. Louisiana Commercial Trucking Market Access Fund
A. There is hereby established within the state treasury a special fund to be
designated the "Louisiana Commercial Trucking Market Access Fund," hereinafter
referred to as the "Market Access Fund." The monies in the Market Access Fund
shall be appropriated solely for the purposes set forth in this Section.
B. The Department shall administer the Market Access Fund and shall adopt
rules pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., to
implement the provisions of this Part, including rules establishing:
(i) The methodology for calculating retained premium attributable to
Louisiana commercial trucking risks;
(ii) The process and timing for annual contributions;
(iii) Audit rights and examination procedures;
(iv) Penalties for non-compliance; and
(v) Procedures for allocation of Fund resources to the Small Carrier Group
Purchasing Pool established pursuant to Part IV of this Act.
C. Interest earned on monies in the Market Access Fund shall be credited to
the Fund. Unexpended balances in the Fund at the end of any fiscal year shall
remain in the Fund and shall not revert to the general fund.
§550.37. Annual Market Access Fund Contribution
A. Every captive insurer covering Louisiana commercial trucking risks shall
pay an annual Market Access Fund contribution equal to three percent of all retained
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
premium attributable to Louisiana commercial trucking risks for the preceding
calendar year.
B. The contribution required by this Section shall be due and payable to the
Department on or before March 31 of each calendar year for the prior year's retained
premium. The Department may, for good cause shown, grant an extension of not
more than sixty days.
C. A captive insurer that fails to timely pay the contribution required by this
Section shall be subject to:
(1) A late payment penalty equal to one percent of the unpaid contribution
for each month or portion thereof that the contribution remains unpaid, not to exceed
twelve percent in the aggregate; and
(2) Suspension of the operating authority of any affiliated commercial
trucking company to operate in Louisiana until the contribution, together with all
applicable penalties and interest, is paid in full.
D. The Department may, by rule, adjust the contribution rate set forth in
Subsection (A) of this Section no more frequently than once every two years,
provided that any adjustment shall be based on actuarial analysis of the adverse
selection impact of captive arrangements on the Louisiana commercial trucking
insurance market and shall not exceed five percent.
§550.38. Annual Reporting
A. Every captive insurer covering Louisiana commercial trucking risks shall
file an annual report with the Department on or before March 31 of each year. The
annual report shall include:
(1) The total amount of insurance premium written for Louisiana commercial
trucking risks during the preceding calendar year;
(2) The total amount of premium ceded to unaffiliated reinsurers;
(3) The retained premium subject to the Market Access Fund contribution;
(4) A certification by a qualified actuary that the captive insurer maintains
adequate reserves for Louisiana commercial trucking risks; and
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
(5) A list of all affiliated commercial trucking companies operating
commercial motor vehicles in Louisiana.
B. The Department may examine the books and records of any captive
insurer that covers Louisiana commercial trucking risks to verify the accuracy of any
annual report filed pursuant to this Section. The cost of such examination shall be
borne by the captive insurer examined.
§550.39. Establishment of small carrier group purchasing pool
A. The Commissioner is hereby authorized and directed to establish, within
one year of the effective date of this Act, the Louisiana Small Carrier Commercial
Trucking Insurance Group Purchasing Pool, hereinafter referred to as the "Pool."
B. The Pool shall be organized as a nonprofit association under the laws of
Louisiana and shall be deemed a governmental entity for purposes of state
purchasing and contracting laws. The Commissioner shall appoint an initial board
of directors consisting of:
(1) Three representatives of Louisiana-domiciled small carriers, at least one
of whom shall be the owner or operator of a minority-owned commercial trucking
company;
(2) Two representatives of the Louisiana Department of Insurance;
(3) One representative nominated by the Louisiana Trucking Association;
and
(4) One licensed insurer producer with experience in commercial trucking
insurance.
C. The Pool shall be funded initially from the Market Access Fund
established pursuant to Part III of this Act. The Pool shall be designed to become
actuarially self-sustaining within five years of establishment through pooled
premium contributions from participating small carriers.
§550.40. Eligibility and participation
A. Participation in the Pool shall be available to any Louisiana-domiciled
commercial trucking company that qualifies as a small carrier as defined in §550.34
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
of this Act.
B. Participation in the Pool shall be voluntary. No small carrier shall be
required to participate in the Pool as a condition of operating in Louisiana.
C. Small carriers participating in the Pool shall:
(1) Certify their Louisiana domicile and fleet size to the Pool administrator
annually;
(2) Pay premiums determined on an actuarially sound basis reflecting the
pooled risk of Pool participants;
(3) Comply with any safety and loss-control requirements established by the
Pool board; and
(4) Report all claims promptly to the Pool administrator.
D. Small carriers that obtain coverage through the Pool shall be deemed to
have satisfied all applicable Louisiana financial responsibility requirements for
commercial motor vehicles covered under the Pool policy.
§550.41. Minimum reserve requirements
A. Every captive insurer covering Louisiana commercial trucking risks shall
maintain, at all times, loss and loss adjustment expense reserves for Louisiana
commercial trucking risks that are:
(1) Calculated on an actuarially sound basis by a qualified actuary using
methods and assumptions consistent with the Statement of Actuarial Opinion
requirements applicable to admitted insurers under Louisiana law;
(2) Not less than the greater of:
(i) The amount indicated by the actuary's central estimate of ultimate liability
for Louisiana commercial trucking claims;
(ii) The seventy-fifth percentile of the actuarial range of such estimates; and
(iii) Supported by liquid assets consisting of cash, investment-grade fixed
income securities, or letters of credit from federally insured financial institutions
with a face amount not less than the required reserve.
B. A captive insurer that fails to maintain reserves meeting the requirements
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
of Subsection (A) shall notify the Department within thirty days of the actuary's
determination and shall submit a plan to achieve compliance within ninety days.
§550.42. Minimum Surplus
A. In addition to the reserve requirements of §550.41 of this Act, every
captive insurer covering Louisiana commercial trucking risks shall maintain a
minimum policyholders' surplus of not less than five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) attributable to Louisiana commercial trucking operations, or such greater
amount as may be required by the Department based on the volume and severity of
Louisiana trucking risks insured.
B. The Commissioner shall promulgate rules establishing a risk-based surplus
formula applicable to captive insurers with significant Louisiana commercial
trucking exposure.
§ 550.43. Qualified actuary certification
A. Every captive insurer subject to this Part shall obtain an annual opinion
from a qualified actuary, as defined under R.S. 22:591 et seq., certifying that the
reserves maintained for Louisiana commercial trucking risks meet the requirements
of §550.41 of this Act.
B. The actuary's opinion shall be filed with the Department as part of the
annual report required under §550.38 of this Act. The opinion shall be provided in
a form prescribed by the Commissioner.
C. A captive insurer that fails to file the required actuarial opinion shall be
subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day of
noncompliance, not to exceed three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in the
aggregate for any single violation.
§550.44. Right to direct action.
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a claimant who obtains a final
judgment against a commercial trucking company whose Louisiana commercial
trucking risks are covered by a captive insurer may bring a direct action against the
captive insurer to enforce the judgment to the extent of available coverage.
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
B. The direct action right provided in this Section shall not expand the limits
of coverage available under the captive arrangement but shall ensure that available
coverage may be accessed directly by judgment creditors without requirement of a
separate proceeding against the commercial trucking company.
§550.45. Mandatory disclosure at time of claim
A. Within thirty days of receiving written notice of a claim arising out of a
commercial trucking accident occurring in Louisiana, every commercial trucking
company and every insurer, including any captive insurer, providing coverage to
such company for Louisiana commercial trucking risks shall disclose in writing to
the claimant or claimant's representative:
(1) The identity of every insurer or captive insurer providing any coverage
applicable to the claim;
(2) The policy number, policy period, and limits of liability of each
applicable policy or coverage agreement;
(3) The name and contact information of the claims representative
responsible for the claim;
(4) Whether the coverage is provided through a captive insurer or
self-insurance arrangement; and
(5) The name and domicile of the captive insurer, if applicable.
B. If a commercial trucking company is insured through a risk retention
group or similar pooling arrangement, the disclosure required by this Section shall
identify the pool or group and the applicable limits of liability.
§550.46. Penalties for failure to disclose
A. A commercial trucking company or insurer that fails to make the
disclosures required by §550.45 within the time prescribed shall be subject to a civil
penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per claim for which
disclosure was required and not made, enforceable by the Department.
B. Failure to disclose as required by §550.45 shall toll the statute of
limitations for any claim against the commercial trucking company or its insurer
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
from the date written notice of claim was given until the date complete disclosure is
made.
C. A claimant may seek enforcement of the disclosure requirements of this
Part in the district court of the parish in which the accident occurred. The court may
award reasonable attorney's fees to a prevailing claimant.
§550.47. Scope of disclosure obligation
A. The disclosure obligation imposed by this Part shall apply regardless of
any of the following:
(a) whether the claimant has filed suit;
(b) whether a reservation of rights has been issued by the insurer; or
(c) whether coverage is disputed.
B. Nothing in this Part shall be construed as an admission of coverage or
liability by any commercial trucking company or captive insurer making the required
disclosures.
§550.48. Rulemaking authority
The Commissioner shall have full authority to promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this Act
pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq. Initial rules shall
be promulgated within one hundred eighty days of the effective date of this Act.
§550.49. Examinations
The Department may examine the operations and records of any captive
insurer, commercial trucking company, or Pool administrator subject to this Act. The
Commissioner may engage independent examiners or actuaries at the expense of the
entity being examined. Examinations shall be conducted in accordance with the
procedures applicable to insurance company examinations under Title 22 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes.
§550.50. Suspension of operating authority
(A) Upon a finding that a commercial trucking company has failed to
comply with the requirements of this Act or that a captive insurer covering the
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
company's Louisiana risks has failed to comply with the requirements of this Act, the
Commissioner may petition the office having jurisdiction over the company's
authority to operate commercial motor vehicles in Louisiana to suspend such
authority pending compliance.
(B) Any suspension under this Section shall be lifted within five business
days of the Commissioner's certification that the deficiencies have been corrected.
§550.51. Civil penalty schedule
In addition to any other penalty provided by this Act, the Commissioner may
impose civil penalties not to exceed the following amounts for violations of this Act:
(1) Failure to file annual report under §550.38: $5,000 per month of
noncompliance;
(2) Failure to maintain required reserves under §550.41: $25,000 per
examination finding;
(3) Failure to maintain minimum surplus under §550.42: $10,000 per month
of noncompliance;
(4) Failure to disclose under §550.45: $5,000 per claim; and
(5) Willful or fraudulent misrepresentation in any filing required under this
Act: $50,000 per violation.
Civil penalties collected under this Section shall be deposited into the Market
Access Fund.
§550.52. Severability
If any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of this Act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
§550.53. Applicability
(A) Parts III and V of this Act shall apply to all captive insurers covering
Louisiana commercial trucking risks for policy periods commencing on or after
January 1, 2027.
Page 11 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1297 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 932
(B) Part IV of this Act shall become operative twelve months after the
effective date of this Act.
(C) Part VI of this Act shall apply to all claims for which written notice is
received on or after the effective date of this Act.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.